Hawaii statutes.
§138-4 Surcharge. (a) A monthly
enhanced 911 surcharge, subject to this chapter, shall be imposed upon each
communications service connection, except connections of the public utility
providing telecommunications services and land line enhanced 911 services
through section 269-16.95.

(b) The rate of the surcharge shall be set at
66 cents per month for each communications service connection. The surcharge
shall have uniform application and shall be imposed on each communications
service connection operating within the State except:

(1) Connections billed to federal, state, and county
governmental5 entities;

(2) Prepaid connections; and

(3) Connections provided by the public utility
providing telecommunications services and land line enhanced 911 services
through section 269-16.95.

(c) All communications service providers and
resellers shall bill to and collect from each of their customers a monthly
surcharge at the rate established for each communications service connection.
The communications service provider or reseller may list the surcharge as a
separate line item on each bill. If a communications service provider or
reseller receives a partial payment for a monthly bill from a communications
service customer, the communications service provider or reseller shall apply
the payment against the amount the customer owes the communications service
provider or reseller, before applying the partial payment against the
surcharge.

(d) A communications service provider that:

(1) Is collecting the surcharge and remitting
appropriate portions of the surcharge to the fund pursuant to this chapter; and

(2) Has been requested by a public safety answering
point to provide enhanced 911 service in a particular county or counties,

may recover enhanced 911 service costs as provided
in this chapter.

(e) Each communications service provider or
reseller may retain two per cent of the amount of surcharges collected to
offset administrative expenses associated with billing and collecting the
surcharge.

(f) A communications service provider or
reseller shall remit to the enhanced 911 fund, within sixty days after the end
of the calendar month in which the surcharge is collected, an amount that
represents the surcharges collected less amounts retained for administrative
expenses incurred by the communications service provider or reseller, as
provided in subsection (e).

(g) A public utility providing
telecommunications services and land line enhanced 911 services for its
customer base and other service providers using the wire line provider's
enhanced 911 service may collect and retain the surcharge at the established
rate set forth in section 269-16.95.

(h) The surcharges collected by the
communications service provider or reseller pursuant to this section shall not
be subject to any tax, fee, or assessment, nor are the surcharges considered
revenue of the provider or reseller.

(i) Each customer who is subject to this
chapter shall be liable to the State for the surcharge until it has been paid
to the communications service provider. Communications service providers shall
have no liability to remit surcharges that have not been paid by customers. A
communications service provider or reseller shall have no obligation to take
any legal action to enforce the collection of the surcharge for which any
customer is billed. However, the board may initiate a collection action
against the customer. If the board prevails in such a collection action,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs shall be awarded.

(j) At any time the members deem it necessary
and appropriate, the board may meet to make recommendations to the legislature
as to whether the surcharge and fund should be discontinued, continued as is,
or amended.

(k) When considering whether to discontinue,
continue as is, or amend the fund or surcharge, the board's recommendations
shall be based on the latest available information concerning costs associated
with providing enhanced 911 service. [L 2004, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2011, c
168, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next